Hawaii statutes.
[§346-253] Rules. The department shall
adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary for the purposes of this part. [L
1989, c 381, pt of §1; am L 1990, c 144, §1 and c 234, §9]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next